Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-693
Evidence in civil actions; conviction not admissible.

No evidence of the conviction of any person for any violation of any provision of the Nebraska Rules of the Road shall be admissible in any court in any civil action.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 118;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,118;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 189.

Evidence of conviction for a traffic infraction, including a conviction for violation of a municipal ordinance, is not admissible in a civil suit for damages arising out of the same traffic infraction. Stevenson v. Wright, 273 Neb. 789, 733 N.W.2d 559 (2007).